Hawaii statutes.
§612-6 Exempt when. [Section
effective until February 28, 2017. For section effective March 1, 2017, see
below.] A person may claim exemption from service as a juror if the person
is:

(1) An elected official while the legislature is in
session, or a judge of the United States, State, or county;

(2) An actively practicing physician or dentist;

(3) A member of the armed forces or militia when on
active service and deployed out-of-state;

(4) An active member of a police or fire department;

(5) A person who has served as a juror, either in a
court of this State or the United States District Court for the District of
Hawaii, within one year preceding the time of filling out the juror
qualification form;

(6) An active member of an emergency medical services
agency;

(7) A person living more than seventy miles from the
court for which jury service is required; or

(8) A person eighty years of age or older.

For purposes of this section, "emergency
medical services agency" means any government agency, private agency, or
company that provides ambulance services, emergency medical services, or
disaster medical services. [L 1973, c 191, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c
366, §3; am L 2006, c 313, §1; am L 2007, c 87, §1]

§612-6 Exempt when. [Section effective March
1, 2017. For section effective until February 28, 2017, see above.] A
person may claim exemption from service as a juror if the person is:

(1) An elected official while the legislature is in
session, or a judge of the United States, State, or county;

(2) An actively practicing physician or dentist;

(3) A member of the armed forces or militia when on
active service and deployed out-of-state;

(4) An active member of a police or fire department;

(5) A person who has served as a juror, either in a
court of this State or the United States District Court for the District of
Hawaii, within one year preceding the time of filling out the juror
qualification form;

(6) An active member of an emergency medical services
agency;

(7) A person living more than seventy miles from the
court for which jury service is required;

(8) A person eighty years of age or older; or

(9) A woman who is breastfeeding a child or
expressing breast milk for a period of two years from the birth of the child.

For purposes of this section, "emergency
medical services agency" means any government agency, private agency, or
company that provides ambulance services, emergency medical services, or
disaster medical services. [L 1973, c 191, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c
366, §3; am L 2006, c 313, §1; am L 2007, c 87, §1; am L 2016, c 46, §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next